California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
No slaughterer shall pick up or receive any dead animal at his slaughterhouse except those which have died en route and such animals shall be transported directly and without delay to a licensed rendering establishment, however apparently healthy animals transported by a person other than a dead animal hauler, found to have just expired on arrival due to injuries during transportation may be immediately slaughtered under conditions specified by the secretary which will conform to the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 187, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19343.

Every establishment where animals are slaughtered for pet food, or where fresh or frozen pet food is processed or prepared shall be maintained and operated in a clean and sanitary manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19344.

All fresh or frozen meat, meat byproducts, horsemeat, and horsemeat byproducts sold or offered for sale to the public as pet food shall conform to the standards of this chapter or regulations promulgated by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19346.

Any carcasses or parts or products of animals which are not intended for use as human food shall prior to their being offered for sale or transportation, be denatured or otherwise identified as prescribed by regulations of the director to prevent their use as human food. No person shall buy, sell, transport, or offer for sale or transportation or receive for transportation any carcasses, parts thereof, meat or meat food product of any such animals which are not intended for use as human food unless they are denatured or otherwise identified as required by the regulations of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19347.

The Legislature finds that the use in pet food of animals that died from reasons other than slaughtering and pet food prepared from diseased animals or not prepared under sanitary conditions creates a public health hazard to the citizens and animals of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19348.

(a) Unless a waiver is granted by the State Veterinarian in conjunction with implementation of Section 9562 or a declaration of a state of emergency or local emergency, as defined in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 8558 of the Government Code, pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), no dead animal hauler or any other person shall transport any dead animal to any place, other than to a licensed rendering plant, a licensed collection center, an animal disease diagnostic laboratory acceptable to the department, the nearest crematory, or to a destination in another state that has been approved for that purpose by the appropriate authorities in that state.

(b) The secretary may issue a master or individual permit to a licensed renderer, collection center, or dead animal hauler for the purpose of authorizing transport of a dead animal to an appropriately permitted landfill under either of the following circumstances:

(1) During a proclaimed state of emergency or local emergency, as defined in subdivisions (b) and (c)
 of Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(2) When the licensed hauler has certification from a licensed renderer, that the licensed renderer cannot process the dead animal due to operational conditions or legal or regulatory requirements or constraints. The certification shall be in a form approved by the department and, for purposes of this paragraph, “licensed hauler” shall include licensed collection centers and renderers.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to conflict with any state or federal environmental or zoning law, or to prohibit an owner of a live animal from burying the animal on the owner’s property after the animal dies if the
 burial is within three miles of where the animal died.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the Department of Transportation or to local agencies having jurisdiction over a road or highway when engaged in removing animal carcasses from the road or highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 280, Sec. 3.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19348.1.

The State Veterinarian is authorized to approve temporary research projects for the purpose of determining whether alternative methods of animal tissue disposal are capable of destroying organisms that cause disease and can be used effectively to protect public health and agricultural animals. Temporary projects shall not be approved for a period longer than 24 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19348.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19348 and regulations adopted by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery pursuant to Section 43020 of the Public Resources Code, including, but not limited to, Section 17855.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, any part of a livestock carcass resulting from a routine livestock mortality event or on-farm processing may be composted if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The composting of the carcass is conducted in accordance with best management practices for livestock composting
 adopted by the secretary in collaboration with the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery and the State Water Resources Control Board. The best management practices shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following specifications:

(A) Protection protocols for groundwater.

(B) Protection of public health and food supply.

(C) Proper management of compost piles.

(D) Collaboration procedures with local enforcement agencies.

(E) Enforcement and penalties for failing to follow the best management practices.

(2) The total amount of composting material onsite at any one time does not exceed 100 cubic yards, inclusive of livestock carcasses.

(3) All composting material, including livestock carcasses, comes from an agricultural site or sites owned or leased by the owner of the livestock carcasses.

(4) The composting activity occurs on an agricultural site owned or leased by the owner of the livestock carcasses. If the activity occurs on an agricultural site owned or leased by the owner that is not the site where the carcasses were generated:

(A) The activity shall occur in the county in which the carcass was generated or within an adjacent county.

(B) The transport of the carcasses shall comply with all applicable state and local laws and regulations.

(5) After the composting material is converted into cured compost, the cured compost is
 applied to an agricultural site owned or leased by the owner of the livestock carcasses that produced the cured compost and in compliance with the best management practices adopted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(6) The operator of the composting operation notifies the applicable local enforcement agency and the regional water quality control board of the facility within 30 days of commencing operation, including the location and operator contact information.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Livestock” means any mammalian animal described in Section 19201.

(2) “On-farm processing” means the slaughter of the livestock under circumstances authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 19020.

(3) “Routine livestock mortality event” means the death of the livestock from a natural cause. “Routine livestock mortality event” does not include any of the following:

(A) The death of the livestock due to being euthanized using barbiturates.

(B) The death of the livestock from a disease listed on the department’s List of Reportable Conditions for Animals and Animal Products published pursuant to Section 9101. 

(C) The death of the livestock in a location that is under
 a quarantine imposed pursuant to Section 9562.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 613, Sec. 2.   (AB 411)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19348.5.

Every person who transports a live horse or horses to a slaughterhouse subject to licensing under this chapter shall provide such horse or horses with adequate food and water. A violation of this section shall constitute cruelty to an animal within the meaning of Section 597a of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

19349.

All trucks and every licensed premises of a dead animal hauler shall be inspected by the bureau at least once a year before the license is renewed and at other times as the secretary deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 187, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19350.

Vehicles used for dead animal hauling shall be completely unloaded, cleaned, and disinfected at the rendering plant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 187, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19352.

Inspectors and duly authorized agents of the state, city, county, and city and county health departments shall have free access at all hours of operation to premises where animals are slaughtered, or horsemeat or other meat products are processed, prepared, packed for pet food, or offered for sale or sold, for purposes of inspection. If slaughtering or carcass preparation or processing of meats and meat products is conducted at hours considered overtime for state employees, or on legal holidays, the owner or operator of the establishment shall by contract or agreement with the department, make arrangement to defray the additional cost for salaries and expenses for persons employed by the department to conduct the necessary inspection work during the overtime periods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19353.

Horses, mules, burros, cattle, sheep, goats and swine may be slaughtered on the premises of a pet food slaughterer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19354.

A dead animal hauler shall register each vehicle used to transport dead animals with the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 187, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19355.

No licensee shall refuse to permit entry or inspection by a representative of the department, or to permit the taking of a sample of products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19356.

No meat or meat byproduct or horsemeat or horsemeat byproduct shall be sold or offered for sale as pet food or for pet food purposes by any person under any name or other marking or labeling which is false or misleading, or in any container of a misleading form or size, but established trade names and other marking and labeling and containers which are not false or misleading and which are approved by the director, are permitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19357.

All labels or other identification marks or methods for articles subject to this chapter shall be approved by the director in advance of their use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19358.

No person shall sell, transport, or offer for sale or transportation any meat or meat byproduct, horsemeat, or horsemeat byproduct subject to this article that is misbranded as prescribed by regulation of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Horsemeat [19360. - 19367.]

19360.

Only horsemeat inspected by state or federal agents shall be sold or offered for sale for human consumption.

When horsemeat is offered for sale for human consumption there shall be displayed prominently in connection therewith and immediately adjacent thereto a sign with letters not less than eight inches in height and not less than three inches in width, bearing the words “horsemeat for human consumption.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19362.

Every restaurant, cafe, or other public eating place offering or serving horsemeat for human consumption shall have stamped on all menus, in green ink letters not less than one-half inch in height and one-quarter inch in width the words “horsemeat served here”; likewise a placard must be prominently displayed bearing the words “horsemeat served here” in letters not less than four inches in height and one-half inch in width.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19363.

Horsemeat or fresh or frozen pet food shall not be packed, stored or kept in any retail establishment with or in close proximity with any food product which is or shall be offered for human consumption irrespective of its type or nature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19364.

Horsemeat or fresh or frozen pet food shall be kept and stored in a separate unit in a retail establishment provided for that purpose. A sign which reads “horsemeat” with letters two inches high and approximately one inch wide shall be conspicuously displayed so that it can readily be seen by those in the room where such horsemeat is sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19365.

All inspected horsemeat shall bear a tag or label with the words “inspected horsemeat,” “U.S. government-inspected horsemeat,” “state-inspected horsemeat,” or “municipally inspected horsemeat,” depending upon the type of inspection made of the product with letters printed thereon not less than one-half inch in height; provided, that the letters may be less than one-half inch in height where the horsemeat is processed, packaged, and sealed at the point of inspection and bears the label required by the inspection agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19366.

All horsemeat intended for pet food purposes not produced in the State of California shall be denatured before entering the state and shall meet all requirements of this chapter and the regulations promulgated thereunder. All inspected horsemeat not produced in the State of California shall be delivered to the warehouse, distributor or elsewhere in the original shipping containers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19367.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent any city, city and county, or county from regulating or prohibiting by ordinance the sale of horsemeat in their respective communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Regulations [19380. - 19385.]

19380.

The director may adopt rules or regulations necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19381.

The director shall by regulation promulgate minimum standards for the fitness of pet food so that the health of the animals and citizens of this state will not be endangered by unwholesome or tainted animal food.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19382.

The director may establish by regulation, requirements to insure that vehicles used to transport dead animals and carcasses or parts or products of animals which have died other than by slaughter will not create a public health problem and that such animals, carcasses or parts or products are not diverted to human or pet food.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19383.

The director shall establish by regulation, requirements for the slaughter of animals and inspection of pet food, to insure that it is wholesome, untainted, not adulterated, properly labeled, and fit for pet food, and for the handling and disposal of condemned meat or meat byproducts to prevent their use as human or pet food.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19384.

The director shall establish by regulation the conditions under which carcasses or parts or products of animals for pet food may be processed, transported, and stored so as to prevent diversion into human food channels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19385.

The director may establish regulations to permit the sale and distribution of food for crab bait and for the feeding of mink and zoo animals under conditions which will conform to the purposes of this chapter but without compliance with such portions thereof which the director finds are unnecessary under any special circumstances involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Records [19400. - 19404.]

19400.

Any person that slaughters any horse, mule, burro, sheep, goats, swine or any other bovine for use as pet food, or who by purchase or otherwise acquires possession of the meat of any horse, mule, burro, swine or bovine, and that sells or otherwise disposes of such meat for use as pet food, or operates a rendering plant shall make and keep for one year a correct record, separate from all other business records, of each such transaction, recorded at the time of the transaction, which shows all of the following:

(a) The quantity of meat, bones, or carcasses acquired or disposed of.

(b) The names and addresses of the parties to the transaction.

(c) The date.

(d) The place to which such meat was shipped or delivered.

(e) The name of the person that made the shipment or delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19401.

This article does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Retail sales of any fresh or processed meat or meat product in a quantity of five pounds or less to any one person.

(b) Any canned or prepackaged meat or meat product in any package of five pounds or less which is conspicuously labeled to show the common or usual names of the ingredients arranged in the order of the predominance contained in the package.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19402.

All horsemeat and animal food records shall be open at all times during the hours of operation to the inspection of the director, any health officer or sanitation inspector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19403.

It is unlawful for any person that is required to keep horsemeat and pet food records to fail to keep such records, or to fail or refuse to permit an authorized inspection of the horsemeat and pet food records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19404.

Every dead animal hauler shall keep a record when and where each carcass is picked up and delivered. The record shall be kept for a period of one year, and open to inspection by any agent of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 187, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Enforcement [19420. - 19421.]

19420.

There is in the Department of Agriculture a compliance and evaluation team.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19421.

The compliance and evaluation team’s primary duty shall be the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and the regulations made pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12.5. Inspection Fees [19430. - 19433.]

19430.

Any person who is licensed pursuant to this chapter, who requests inspection at time which is considered as overtime by Section 19352 shall be liable for overtime inspection fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19432.

Any fee, charge, or assessment payable under the provisions of this chapter and regulations promulgated pursuant to it, shall constitute a debt of the person owing such fee, charge or assessment and shall be payable to the director on the date provided by the director. If such person does not pay the charge or assessment on the date specified, the director shall add to such unpaid fee, charge or assessment an amount not exceeding 25 percent of such unpaid charge, fee, or assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19433.

In establishing such fee, charge, or assessment the director shall give consideration to the fees, charges and assessments provided under the provisions of law stated above, with the exception of the license fees. The schedule of fees, charges, and assessments may from time to time be revised by the director as he deems necessary. Such schedules may be sufficient to provide such reserves as the director deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Penalties [19440. - 19447.]

19440.

Any person who is found guilty of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter is subject to imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both that imprisonment and fine; but if the violation is committed after a conviction of
 that person under this section has become final, or the violation is committed with intent to defraud or mislead, the person shall be subject to imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars
 ($15,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 303, Sec. 2.   (AB 2378)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19441.

Any person who, as principal or agent, employer or employee, adulterates any other meat or meat food product intended for human food with horsemeat or the product of an animal which has died otherwise than by slaughter or the product of an animal slaughtered for pet food in accordance with this chapter, or represents horsemeat or pet food to be any other meat or meat food product, shall be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 122.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

19443.

In addition to the remedies herein provided, the department may bring an action in superior court and such court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of this chapter. Any proceeding under the provisions of this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the department shall not be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19444.

Upon conviction of a violation of any provision of this chapter, any license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be automatically suspended for 30 days. The director may, after notice and hearing, suspend the license for a longer period if he believes the suspension will promote the objectives of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19445.

(a) In lieu of levying a civil penalty pursuant to Section 19447, and in lieu of seeking prosecution, upon complaint of the secretary, the Attorney General may bring an action for civil penalties in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person who violates Article 6 (commencing with Section 19300), Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310), or any regulation adopted pursuant to those articles. The civil penalty imposed shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(b) Any funds recovered by the secretary pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, and upon appropriation by the Legislature,
 shall be used for the purposes described in Section 221.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 29.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19446.

In addition to any other remedies provided by this chapter, but in lieu of seeking prosecution of any violation of Article 6 (commencing with Section 19300) or Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310) as a misdemeanor, the director may seek recovery of a civil penalty pursuant to Section 19445 or levy civil penalties pursuant to Section 19447.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1036, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19447.

(a) In lieu of any civil action pursuant to Section 19445, and in lieu of seeking prosecution, the secretary may levy a civil penalty against a person who violates Article 6 (commencing with Section 19300), Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310), or any regulation adopted pursuant to those articles, in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation.

(b) Before a civil penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall receive notice of the nature of the violation and shall be granted the opportunity to review the secretary’s evidence and, for up to 30 days following the issuance of the notice, the opportunity to present written argument and evidence to the secretary as to why the civil penalty should not be imposed or
 should be reduced from the amount specified in the penalty notice. Notwithstanding Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of, Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or any other provision of law, this section does not require the department to conduct either a formal or informal hearing. The secretary instead may dispose of the matter upon review of the documentation presented.

(c) Any person upon whom a civil penalty is levied may appeal to the secretary within 20 days of the date of receiving notification of the penalty, as follows:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent and shall state the grounds for the appeal.

(2) Any party, at the time of filing the appeal, or within 10 days thereafter,
 may present written evidence and a written argument to the secretary.

(3) The secretary may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written arguments are made.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given at least 10 days prior to the date set therefor. This time requirement may be altered by an agreement between the secretary and the person appealing the penalty.

(5) The secretary shall decide the appeal on any oral or written arguments, briefs, and evidence that he or she has received.

(6) The secretary shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal, or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments. A copy of the secretary’s
 decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant.

(7) The secretary may sustain the decision, modify the decision by reducing the amount of the penalty levied, or reverse the decision.

(8) A review of the decision of the secretary may be sought by the appellant pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) (1) If the person upon whom a penalty is levied does not file a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, the court, upon receiving a certified copy of the department’s final decision that directs payment of a civil penalty, shall enter judgment in favor of the department.

(2) After completion of the appeal procedure provided for in this section, the secretary may file a certified copy of the
 department’s final decision that directs payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, any order denying a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county that has jurisdiction over the matter. No fees shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official services required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(e) Any penalties levied by the secretary pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used for the purposes described in Section 221.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 68.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Slaughter [19501. - 19503.]

19501.

(a) Cattle, calves, horses, mules, sheep, swine, goats, or fallow deer, or poultry shall be slaughtered by the methods prescribed in this section. No state agency shall contract for, purchase, procure, or sell all or any portion of any animal, unless that animal is slaughtered in conformity with this chapter. This chapter applies to any person engaged in the business of slaughtering animals enumerated in this section, or any person slaughtering any of those animals when all, or any part of, that animal is subsequently sold or used for commercial purposes.

(b) All cattle, calves, horses, mules, sheep, swine, goats, or fallow deer subject to this part, or poultry subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 24501) of, Part 2 (commencing with Section 25401) of, and Part 3 (commencing with Section 26401) of, Division 12 shall be slaughtered by either of the following prescribed methods:

(1) The animal shall be rendered insensible to pain by a captive bolt, gunshot, electrical or chemical means, or any other means that is rapid and effective before being cut, shackled, hoisted, thrown, or cast, with the exception of poultry which may be shackled.

(2) The animal shall be handled, prepared for slaughter, and slaughtered in accordance with ritual requirements of the Jewish or any other religious faith that prescribes a method of slaughter whereby the animal suffers loss of consciousness by anemia of the brain caused by the simultaneous and instantaneous severance of the carotid arteries with a sharp instrument. 

This section does not apply to the slaughter of spent hens and small game birds, as defined by the department by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19501.5.

(a) The department shall, on or before December 31, 1993, adopt regulations to implement Section 19501 as to the slaughter of poultry, and, thereafter, enforce those regulations. 

(b) The regulations adopted under subdivision (a) shall apply to any person engaged in the business of slaughtering poultry, or to any person slaughtering poultry when all, or any part of, the poultry is subsequently sold or used for commercial purposes, except as provided in Section 19501. However, the department shall not utilize personnel to enforce those regulations with respect to any poultry plant in this state exempted from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 24651) of Part 1 of Division 12 by Section 24712, 24713, or 24714.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 837, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19502.

The regulations adopted under this chapter shall conform as far as possible to the regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture governing methods of slaughtering.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------

19503.

The Department of Agriculture shall enforce the provisions of Section 19501 and is authorized and directed to perform the following duties:

Designate, on or before March 1, 1968, and at such times thereafter as it deems advisable, methods of slaughter and of handling in connection with slaughter, with respect to each species of livestock enumerated in Section 19501, which conform to the provisions of Section 19501. In addition, the department may designate other methods not specifically described in Section 19501. However, nothing in this section shall authorize the department to prohibit any method specifically permitted in Section 19501.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. Livestock Confinement [19700. - 19700.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [19700. - 19700.]



  ARTICLE 1. Fees [19700. - 19700.]

19700.

(a) (1) The secretary shall adopt, by regulation, fees to cover the department’s reasonable regulatory costs of the administration, implementation, and enforcement of laws governing the confinement of animals, as described in Chapter 13.8 (commencing with Section 25990) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Costs of administration, implementation, and enforcement may include, but are not limited to, costs incurred for the department’s role in registration, certification, inspections, and audits.

(b) (1) The total revenue collected each year through the fees imposed pursuant to this section shall be set at an amount equal
 to the expenditure levels set forth in the Budget Act of each fiscal year for the activity described in subdivision (a).

(2) The secretary may adjust the fees each fiscal year to conform to the expenditure levels set forth in the Budget Act for this activity, plus any share of statewide general administrative costs assessed to the Department of Agriculture Account, Department of Food and Agriculture Fund for that fiscal year. Fee adjustments for this purpose shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) If the secretary determines that the revenue collected during the preceding year was greater than, or less than, the expenditure levels set forth in the Budget Act, the secretary may further adjust the fees to compensate for the over or under collection of revenue.

(c) The fees established in subdivision (a) shall include amounts sufficient to repay any amount loaned from the Department of Agriculture Account, Department of Food and Agriculture Fund in the 2020–21 and 2021–22 fiscal years to pay for the department’s reasonable regulatory costs of the administration, implementation, and enforcement conducted under laws governing the confinement of animals, as described in Chapter 13.8 (commencing with Section 25990) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The fees collected by the secretary pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be separately accounted for in the Department of Agriculture Account, Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.   (AB 92)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. CATTLE PROTECTION [20001. - 22086.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions [20001. - 20030.]

20001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20002.

“Animal,” “calf,” and “cattle” mean only bovine animals.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20003.

“Brand” means a design which is permanently impressed on the hide of an animal by burning with acid, a chemical compound, or a hot iron.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20004.

“Brand” includes “brand and mark” if a mark is recorded or used with a brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20005.

“Bureau” means the Bureau of Livestock Identification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20006.

“Carcass” means the carcass of an animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20007.

“Cattle record brand” means a brand used to classify an animal for the purpose of keeping records which relate to the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20008.

“Chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Livestock Identification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20009.

“Hide” means the hide of an animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20010.

“Inspector” means a hide and brand inspector. It includes the chief, regional brand supervisors, senior brand inspectors, investigators, and persons employed on a collaborative basis pursuant to Section 483 to carry out this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 828, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20011.

“Mark” means a design which is cut into or from the ear, dewlap, or other part of an animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20012.

“Vent” means a design which is permanently impressed on the hide of a branded animal for the purpose of voiding the prior brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

20013.

“Feedlot” means a beef cattle feedlot or feed yard having more than 500 head of cattle at one time during the calendar year in which cattle are being fed for slaughter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

20014.

“Beef cattle” means bovine animals of any breed being grown primarily for meat production.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

20015.

“Registered feedlot” means a feedlot defined in Section 20013 that is registered with the bureau in accordance with Sections 21081 and 21082.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

20016.

“Licensed frozen food locker plant” means an establishment defined and licensed pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 28800) of Division 22 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

20017.

“Modified point-of-origin inspection area” means any area designated by the director, by regulation, pursuant to Section 21111.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

20018.

“Upon entry into a registered feedlot” means brand inspection of the cattle as soon after arrival at the feedlot as is consistent with the provisions of Section 21172.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

20019.
